Hawaii statutes.
§445-132 Fee. The treasurer may grant
licenses for the period of one year, to suitable persons, to carry on the
business of pawnbroking upon payment of the sum of $100. [L 1886, c 28, §2; am
L 1905, c 35, §1; RL 1925, §2073; RL 1935, §2493; RL 1945, §7097; RL 1955,
§155-77; HRS §445-132; am L 1990, c 164, §20]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next